Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-201.01
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 51-201 to 51-219:

(1) Basic services shall include, but not be limited to, free loan of circulating print and nonprint materials from the local collection and general reference and information services; and

(2) Nonbasic services shall include, but not be limited to, use of:

(a) Photocopying equipment;

(b) Telephones, facsimile equipment, and other telecommunications equipment;

(c) Media equipment;

(d) Personal computers; and

(e) Videocassette recording and playing equipment.

Laws 1990, LB 1236, § 1.